Louisiana, session 2026, HB1079.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3991(C)(1)(c)(vii) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3991. Charter schools; requirements; limitations; renewal; amendment; revocation;
board membership
* * *
C. A charter school shall:
* * *
(1)
* * *
(c)
* * *
(vii) Each charter school, except for any school in a school district where the
majority of schools were transferred from the local district to the Recovery School
District, may give enrollment preference to a student who falls into any of the
following categories:
(aa) An entering kindergarten student who attended one of the following:
(I) A licensed early learning center operated by the charter school.
(II) A licensed early learning center not operated by the charter school, if the
student attended the center for at least seventy-five days and the charter school and
the center have an enrollment articulation agreement.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1079 ENROLLED
(bb) A student whose parent or legal guardian is serving in active military
service.
(cc) A student who is in foster care pursuant to placement through the
Department of Children and Family Services.
(dd) A student who is the subject of a court-ordered custody plan.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.